North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159C. Industrial and Pollution Control Facilities Financing Act.
§ 159C-7.
Approval of industrial projects and pollution control projects by Secretary of Commerce.

Approval Required. — No bonds may be issued by an authority to finance an industrial project or a pollution control project unless the project for which their issuance is proposed is first approved by the Secretary of Commerce. The authority shall file an application for approval of its proposed industrial project or pollution control project with the Secretary of Commerce, and shall notify the Local Government Commission of the filing.

Findings. — The Secretary shall not approve any proposed industrial project or pollution control project unless the Secretary makes all of the following, applicable findings:

In the case of a proposed industrial project, that the proposed project will not have a materially adverse effect on the environment.

In the case of a proposed pollution control project, that the project will have a materially favorable impact on the environment or will prevent or diminish materially the impact of pollution which would otherwise occur.

(2a)

In the case of a hazardous waste facility or low-level radioactive waste facility that is used as a reduction, recovery or recycling facility, that such project will further the waste management goals of North Carolina and will not have an adverse effect upon public health or a significant adverse effect on the environment.

In the case of an industrial project or a pollution control project, except a pollution control project for a public utility,

That the jobs to be generated or saved, directly or indirectly, by the proposed project will be large enough in number to have a measurable impact on the area immediately surrounding the proposed project and will be commensurate with the size and cost of the proposed project,

That the proposed operator of the proposed project has demonstrated or can demonstrate the capability to operate the project, and

That the financing of the project by the authority will not cause or result in the abandonment of an existing industrial or manufacturing facility of the proposed operator or an affiliate elsewhere within the State unless the facility is to be abandoned because of obsolescence, lack of available labor in the area, or site limitations.

(b1)

Initial Operator. —

If the initial proposed operator of an industrial project or a pollution control project is not expected to be the operator for the term of the bonds proposed to be issued, the Secretary may make the findings required pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1)a. and (3)b. of this section only with respect to the initial operator. The initial operator shall be identified in the application for approval of the proposed project.

Public Hearing. — The Secretary of Commerce shall not approve any proposed industrial project or pollution control project pursuant to this section unless the governing body of the county in which the project is located has first conducted a public hearing and, at or after the public hearing, approved in principle the issuance of bonds under this Chapter for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost of the proposed project. Notice of the public hearing shall be published at least once in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county not less than 14 days before the public hearing. The notice shall describe generally the bonds proposed to be issued and the proposed project, including its general location, and any other information the governing body considers appropriate or the Secretary of Commerce prescribes for the purpose of providing the Secretary with the views of the community. The notice shall also state that following the public hearing the authority intends to file an application for approval of the proposed project with the Secretary of Commerce.

Certificate of Department of Environmental Quality. — The Secretary of Commerce shall not make the findings required by subdivisions (b)(1)b and (2) of this section unless the Secretary has first received a certification from the Department of Environmental Quality that, in the case of a proposed industrial project, the proposed project will not have a materially adverse effect on the environment and that, in the case of a proposed pollution control project, the proposed project will have a materially favorable impact on the environment or will prevent or diminish materially the impact of pollution which would otherwise occur. The Secretary of Commerce shall not make the findings required by subdivision (2a) unless the Secretary has first received a certification from the Department of Environmental Quality that the proposed project is environmentally sound, will not have an adverse effect on public health and will further the waste management goals of North Carolina. The Secretary of Commerce shall deliver a copy of the application to the Department of Environmental Quality. The Department of Environmental Quality shall provide each certification to the Secretary of Commerce within seven days after the applicant satisfactorily demonstrates to it that all permits, including environmental permits, necessary for the construction of the proposed project have been obtained, unless the authority consents to a longer period of time.

Waiver of Wage Requirement. — If the Secretary of Commerce has made all of the required findings respecting a proposed industrial project except that prescribed in subdivision (b)(1)a of this section, the Secretary may, in the Secretary’s discretion, approve the proposed industrial project if the Secretary has received (i) a resolution of the governing body of the county requesting that the proposed industrial project be approved notwithstanding that the operator will not pay an average weekly manufacturing wage above the average weekly manufacturing wage in the county and (ii) a letter from an appropriate State official, selected by the Secretary, to the effect that unemployment in the county is especially severe.

Rules. — To facilitate review of each proposed industrial project or pollution control project, the Secretary may require the authority to obtain and submit any data and information about the project the Secretary may prescribe. The Secretary may also prescribe forms and rules the Secretary considers reasonably necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Certificate of Approval. — If the Secretary approves the proposed industrial project or pollution control project, the Secretary shall prepare a certificate of approval evidencing the approval and setting forth the findings and shall cause the certificate of approval to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county. This approval shall be reviewable as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes only by an action filed, within 30 days after notice of the findings and approval have been so published, in the Superior Court of Wake County. The superior court is vested with jurisdiction to hear the action, but if no action is filed within the 30 days prescribed, the validity of the approval is conclusively presumed, and no court has authority to inquire into the approval. Copies of the certificate of approval of the proposed industrial project or pollution control project will be given to the authority, the board of county commissioners, and the Secretary of the Local Government Commission.The certificate of approval becomes effective immediately following the expiration of the 30-day period or the expiration of any appeal period after a final determination by any court of any action timely filed pursuant to this section. The certificate expires one year after its date unless extended by the Secretary who shall not extend the certificate unless the Secretary again approves the proposed industrial project or pollution control project as provided in this section. If bonds are issued within that year pursuant to the authorization of this Chapter to pay all or part of the costs of the industrial project or pollution control project, however, the certificate expires three years after the date of the first issuance of the bonds.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 198, s. 23; c. 719, ss. 2, 3; c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 109, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 22; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, ss. 218(161), 219(38); c. 751, s. 8(29); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 79; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 575, s. 6; 1997-443, s. 11A.123; 1997-463, s. 2; 2000-179, s. 6; 2004-132, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2004-132, s. 3, provides: “The Department of Commerce shall encourage projects applying for industrial revenue bonds under Chapter 159C or Chapter 159D of the General Statutes to locate the projects in development zones.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-132, s. 1, effective July 29, 2004, rewrote subdivision (b)(1).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (d).

§ 159C-8.
Approval of bonds.

No bonds may be issued by an authority unless the issuance of the bonds is first approved by the Local Government Commission.The authority shall file an application for approval of its proposed bond issue with the Secretary of the Local Government Commission, and shall notify the Secretary of Commerce of the filing if the project is an industrial project or pollution control project.

In determining whether a proposed bond issue should be approved, the Local Government Commission may consider any of the following:

Whether the proposed operator and obligor have demonstrated or can demonstrate the financial responsibility and capability to fulfill their obligations with respect to the financing agreement. In making such determination, the Commission may consider the operator’s experience and the obligor’s ratio of current assets to current liabilities, net worth, earnings trends and coverage of fixed charges, the nature of the industry or business involved and its stability and any additional security such as credit enhancement, insurance, guaranties or property to be pledged to secure such bonds.

Whether the political subdivisions in or near which the proposed project is to be located have the ability to cope satisfactorily with the impact of the project and to provide, or cause to be provided, the public facilities and services, including utilities, that will be necessary for the project and on account of any increase in population which are expected to result from the project.

Whether the proposed date and manner of sale will have an adverse effect upon any scheduled or anticipated sale of obligations by the State or any political subdivision or any agency of either of them.

Any other factors the Commission considers relevant.

The Local Government Commission shall not approve the issuance of bonds for a special purpose project unless the governing body of the county in which the special purpose project is located has conducted a public hearing and, at or after the public hearing, approved in principle the issuance of bonds under this Chapter for the purposes of paying all or a part of the proposed special purpose project. Notice of the public hearing must be published at least once in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county not less than 14 days before the public hearing. The notice must describe generally the bonds proposed to be issued and the proposed special purpose project, including its general location, and any other information the governing body considers appropriate.

If the initial proposed operator of the project is not expected to be the operator for the term of the bonds proposed to be issued, the Local Government Commission may consider the matters required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section only with respect to the initial operator. The obligor shall be obligated to perform all of the duties of the obligor required hereunder during the term the bonds are outstanding. The Local Government Commission shall evaluate the obligor’s ability to perform these duties without regard to whether the initial proposed operator of the project is expected to be the operator for the term of the bonds proposed to be issued. To facilitate the review of the proposed bond issue by the Commission, the Secretary may require the authority to obtain and submit any financial data and information about the proposed bond issue and the security for it, including the proposed prospectus or offering circular, the proposed financing agreement and security document and annual and other financial reports and statements of the obligor, as the Secretary may prescribe. The Secretary may also prescribe any forms and rules the Secretary considers reasonably necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 198, s. 23; 1979, c. 109, s. 1; 1989, c. 751, s. 7(49); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 80; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 575, s. 7; 2000-179, s. 7.

§ 159C-9.
Sale of bonds.

Bonds may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as the Local Government Commission shall determine to be for the best interests of the authority and effectuate best the purposes of this Chapter irrespective of the interest limitations set forth in

G.S. 24-1.1

, as amended, and successor provisions, provided that such sale shall be approved by the authority and the obligor.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-10.
Location of projects.

Except as provided in this section, any project or projects of an authority shall be located within the boundaries of the county for which the authority was created. A portion or portions of any project including, but not limited to, any real or personal property or improvements necessary or convenient for the construction, maintenance, and operation of the project, may be located in a county or counties other than the county in which the principal part of the project is located so long as the additional portion or portions constitute functionally appurtenant or incidental facilities and the governing body of each other county in which the additional portion or portions of the project is or are located approves the project. In addition, if a project or a group of related projects is located in two or more adjacent counties, the authority created for any one of the counties may issue bonds as provided in

G.S. 159C-6

for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of the project or group of related projects if the following conditions are met:

The board of commissioners of each county in which the project or group of related projects is located has consented.

The governing body of the authority created for each county in which the project or group of related projects is located has consented.

The bonds are issued in compliance with all other provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1993, c. 130, s. 1; 1997-463, s. 3.

§ 159C-11.
Financing agreements.

Every financing agreement shall provide that:

The amounts payable under the financing agreement shall be sufficient to pay all of the principal of and redemption premium, if any, and interest on the bonds issued by the authority to pay the cost of the project as they respectively become due.

The obligor shall pay all costs incurred by the authority in connection with the financing and administration of the project, except as may be paid out of the proceeds of bonds or otherwise, including insurance costs, the cost of administering the financing agreement and the security document and the fees and expenses of the fiscal agent or trustee, paying agents, attorneys, consultants and others.

The obligor shall pay all the costs and expenses of operation, maintenance and upkeep of the project.

The obligor’s obligation to provide for the payment of the bonds in full is not subject to cancellation, termination or abatement until payment of the bonds or provision for their payment has been made.

If the proposed initial operator of the project is not expected to be the operator for the term of the bonds proposed to be issued, the financing agreement shall require that the obligor attempt to arrange for a new operator when the current operator discontinues serving as operator. The new operator is subject to the approval of the Secretary under subdivisions (b)(1)a. and (3)b. of

G.S. 159C-7

if the project is an industrial project or a pollution control project, and is subject in any event to the approval of the Local Government Commission under

G.S. 159C-8

.

The financing agreement, if in the nature of a lease agreement, shall either provide that the obligor has an option to purchase, or require that the obligor purchase, the project upon the expiration or termination of the financing agreement subject to the condition that payment in full of the principal of, and the interest and any redemption premium on, the bonds, or provision for payment, has been made.The financing agreement may provide the authority with rights and remedies in the event of a default by the obligor under the agreement, including any one or more of the following:

Acceleration of all amounts payable under the financing agreement;

Reentry and repossession of the project;

Termination of the financing agreement;

Leasing or sale or foreclosure of the project to others; and

Taking whatever actions at law or in equity may appear necessary or desirable to collect the amounts payable under, and to enforce covenants made in, the financing agreement.

The authority’s interest in a project under a financing agreement may be that of owner, lessor, lessee, conditional or installment vendor, mortgagor, mortgagee, secured party or otherwise, but the authority need not have any ownership or possessory interest in the project.The authority may assign all or any of its rights and remedies under the financing agreement to the trustee or the bondholders under a security document.The financing agreement may contain any additional provisions the authority considers necessary or convenient to effectuate the purposes of this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1979, c. 109, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 575, s. 8; 2000-179, s. 8.

§ 159C-12.
Security documents.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this Chapter may be secured by a security document which may be a trust instrument between the authority and a bank or trust company or individual within the State, or a bank or a trust company without the State, as trustee. Such security document may pledge and assign the revenues provided for the security of the bonds, including proceeds from the sale of any project, or part thereof, insurance proceeds and condemnation awards, and may convey or mortgage the project and other property to secure a bond issue.

The revenues and other funds derived from the project, except such part thereof as may be necessary to provide reserves therefor, if any, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such security document in a sinking fund which may be thereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. The use and disposition of money to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the security document. Such security document may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, without limitation, any one or more of the following:

Acceleration of all amounts payable under the security document;

Appointment of a receiver to manage the project and any other property mortgaged or assigned as security for the bonds;

Foreclosure and sale of the project and any other property mortgaged or assigned as security for the bonds; and

Rights to bring and maintain such other actions at law or in equity as may appear necessary or desirable to collect the amounts payable under, or to enforce the covenants made in, the security document.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds, revenues or other funds provided under this Chapter to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such security document may be treated as a part of the cost of the project in connection with which bonds are issued or as an expense of administration of such project.

The authority may subordinate the bonds or its rights under the financing agreement or otherwise to any prior, contemporaneous or future securities or obligations or lien, mortgage or other security interest.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 719, s. 4; 1979, c. 109, s. 1.

§ 159C-13.
Trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all money received pursuant to the authority of this Chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Chapter. The security document may provide that any of such moneys may be temporarily invested and reinvested pending the disbursement thereof in such securities and other investments as shall be provided in such security document, and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purpose hereof, subject to such regulations as this Chapter and such security document may provide.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-14.
Tax exemption.

The authority shall not be required to pay any taxes on any project or on any other property owned by the authority under the provisions of this Chapter or upon the income therefrom.

The interest on bonds issued by the authority shall be exempt from all income taxes within the State.

All projects and all transactions therefor shall be subject to taxation to the extent such projects and transactions would be subject to taxation if no public body were involved therewith.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 719, s. 5.

§ 159C-15.
Construction contracts.

The authority may agree with the prospective operator that all contracts relating to the acquisition, construction, installation and equipping of a project shall be solicited, negotiated, awarded and executed by the prospective operator and its agents subject only to such approvals by the authority as the authority may require in such agreement. Such agreement may provide that the authority may, out of the proceeds of bonds, make advances to or reimburse the operator for all or a portion of its costs incurred in connection with such contracts.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 719, s. 6.

§ 159C-16.
Conflict of interest.

If any officer, commissioner or employee of the authority, or any member of the governing body of the county for which the authority is created, shall be interested either directly or indirectly in any contract with the authority, such interest shall be disclosed to the authority and the county board of commissioners and shall be set forth in the minutes of the authority and the county board of commissioners, and the officer, commissioner, employee or member having such interest therein shall not participate on behalf of the authority in the authorization of any such contract or on behalf of the governing body of the county in the approval of the bonds to be issued by the authority to finance the project, respectively; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to the ownership of less than one per centum (1%) of the stock of any operator or obligor. Failure to take any or all actions necessary to carry out the purposes of this section shall not affect the validity of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 719, s. 7.

§ 159C-17.
Credit of State not pledged.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this Chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State or any political subdivision or any agency thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or any political subdivision or any such agency, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and other funds provided therefor. Each bond issued under this Chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the authority shall not be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from the revenues and other funds pledged therefor and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or any political subdivision or any agency thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-18.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by an authority under the provisions of this Chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and agencies of the State and all political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-19.
Revenue refunding bonds.

Each authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding that have been issued under the provisions of this Chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium on them and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds, and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for either or both of the following additional purposes:

Constructing improvements, additions, extensions or enlargements of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded have been issued, and

Paying all or any part of the cost of any additional project or projects.

(a1)

The issuance of these bonds, their maturities and other details, the rights of their holders, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority in respect to them shall be governed by the provisions of this Chapter that relate to the issuance of bonds, to the extent appropriate, including that the bonds may have a single maturity within the limit prescribed by

G.S. 159C-6

.The approvals required by

G.S. 159C-7

and 159C-8 shall be obtained prior to the issuance of any refunding bonds, except that if the refunding bonds of all or a portion of an issue are to be issued solely for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds issued under this Chapter, the approval required by

G.S. 159C-7

is not required as to the project financed with the bonds to be refunded.

Refunding bonds issued under this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds issued under this Chapter and, if sold, their proceeds may be applied, in addition to any other authorized purposes, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the outstanding bonds. Refunding bonds may be issued, in the determination of the authority, at any time before the date of maturity or maturities or the date selected for the redemption of the bonds being refunded by them. Pending the application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal of and accrued interest and any redemption premium on the bonds being refunded, and, if so provided or permitted in the security document securing them, to the payment of any interest on the refunding bonds and any expenses in connection with the refunding, the proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America that mature or are subject to redemption by the holder, at the option of such holder, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing on them, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1997-463, s. 4; 2000-179, s. 9.

§ 159C-20.
No power of eminent domain.

No authority shall have any right or power to acquire any property through the exercise of eminent domain or any proceedings in the nature of eminent domain.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-21.
Dissolution of authorities.

Whenever the board of commissioners of an authority and the governing body of the county for which such authority was created shall by joint resolution determine that the purposes for which the authority was formed have been substantially fulfilled and that all bonds theretofore issued and all other obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid or satisfied, such board of commissioners and governing body may declare the authority to be dissolved. On the effective date of such joint resolution, the title to all funds and other property owned by the authority at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the county or in such other political subdivisions as the county shall direct, and possession of such funds and other property shall forthwith be delivered to the county or to such other political subdivisions in accordance with the direction of the county.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-22.
Annual reports; application of Article 3, Subchapter III of Chapter 159.

Each authority shall, promptly following the close of each calendar year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governing body of the county for which the authority was created. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the authority during such year.

The provisions of Article 3, Subchapter III of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes of North Carolina entitled: “The Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act” shall have no application to authorities created pursuant to this Chapter.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1; 1977, c. 719, s. 8.

§ 159C-23.
Officers not liable.

No commissioner of any authority shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any bonds or the issuance thereof.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-24.
Additional method.

The foregoing sections of this Chapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that the issuance of bonds or refunding bonds under the provisions of this Chapter need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 1.

§ 159C-25.
Liberal construction.

This Chapter, being necessary for the prosperity and welfare of the State and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 2.

§ 159C-26.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

Insofar as the provisions of this Chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any general, special or local laws, or parts thereof, the provisions of this Chapter shall be controlling.

History.

1975, c. 800, s. 3.

§ 159C-27.
Creation, etc., of prior authorities ratified.

The creation, formation and organization of all authorities heretofore [prior to June 24, 1977] purported to have been created, formed and organized are hereby ratified, confirmed and validated.

History.

1977, c. 719, s. 9.

§ 159C-28.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-218, s. 5, effective July 1, 2001.